Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-112 Exhaustion of other coverage.
(a) Any person having a claim against an insurer whether or not the insurer is
a member insurer under any provision in an insurance policy other than a policy
of an insolvent insurer that is also a covered claim, shall be required to
exhaust first the person's rights under the policy. Any amount payable on a
covered claim under this part shall be reduced by the amount of any recovery
under the insurance policy. If there are any other policies issued by an insolvent
insurer applicable to the covered claim, then all such policies shall be
exhausted before any claim can be deemed a covered claim subject to being
covered by the association.

(1) A claim under a policy providing liability
coverage to a person who may be jointly and severally liable as a joint
tortfeasor with a person covered under the policy of the insolvent insurer that
gives rise to the covered claim shall be considered to be a claim arising from
the same facts, injury, or loss that gave rise to the covered claim against the
association.

(2) A claim under an insurance policy other than a
life insurance policy shall include, but is not limited to:

(A) A claim against a health maintenance
organization, a hospital plan corporation, a professional health service
corporation, or disability insurance policy; and

(B) Any amount payable by or on behalf of a
self-insurer.

(3) The person insured by the insolvent insurer's
policy may not be pursued by a third-party claimant for any amount paid to the
third party by which the association's obligation is reduced by the application
of this section.

(b) Any person having a claim that may be
recovered under more than one insurance guaranty association or its equivalent
shall seek recovery first from the association of the place of residence of the
insured, except that if the claim is a first-party claim for damage to property
with a permanent location, the person shall seek recovery first from the
association of the location of the property. For a workers' compensation
claim, the person shall seek recovery first from the association of the
residence of the claimant. Any recovery under this part shall be reduced by
the amount of recovery from any other insurance guaranty association or its
equivalent. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 93, §11; am L 2012, c 250, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next